Utah statutes.
9-9-210.   Criminal jurisdiction of state over hunting, trapping, or fishing
offenses on reservations -- "Indian reservation" defined.
As used in this part, "Indian reservation" means:
(1)  all land within the limits of any Indian reservation under the
jurisdiction of the United States government, notwithstanding the issuance of
any patent, and, including rights of way running through the reservation; and
(2)  all Indian allotments, to which the Indian titles have not been
extinguished, including rights of way, thereon.
